Utah statutes.
48-2c-1207.   Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.
(1)  If the division determines that one or more grounds exist under Section
48-2c-1206 for dissolving a company, it shall mail to the company written
notice of:
(a)  the division's determination that one or more grounds exist for
dissolving the company; and
(b)  the grounds for dissolving the company.
(2) (a)  If the company does not correct each ground for dissolution, or
demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the division that each ground
does not exist, within 60 days after mailing the notice provided in Subsection
(1), the division shall administratively dissolve the company.
(b)  If a company is dissolved under Subsection (2)(a), the division shall
mail written notice of the administrative dissolution to the dissolved company
at its principal office, stating the date of dissolution specified in
Subsection (2)(d).
(c)  The division shall mail a copy of the notice of administrative
dissolution including a statement of the grounds for the administrative
dissolution, to:
(i)  the registered agent of the dissolved company; or
(ii)  if there is no registered agent of record, or if the mailing to the
registered agent is returned as undeliverable, at least one member if the
company is member-managed or one manager of the company if the company is
manager-managed, at their addresses as reflected on the notice, annual report,
or document most recently filed with the division.
(d)  A company's effective date of administrative dissolution is five days
after the date the division mails the written notice of dissolution under
Subsection (2)(b).
(e)  On the effective date of dissolution, any assumed names filed on behalf
of the dissolved company under Title 42, Chapter 2, Conducting Business Under
Assumed Name, are canceled.
(f)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(e), the name of the company that is
dissolved and any assumed names filed on its behalf are not available for two
years from the effective date of dissolution for use by any other person:
(i)  transacting business in this state; or
(ii)  doing business under an assumed name under Title 42, Chapter 2,
Conducting Business Under Assumed Name.
(g)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(e), if the company that is dissolved is
reinstated in accordance with Section 48-2c-1208, the registration of the name
of the company and any assumed names filed on its behalf are reinstated back
to the effective date of dissolution.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a company administratively
dissolved under this section continues its existence but may not carry on any
business except:
(i)  the business necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs
under Part 13, Winding Up; and
(ii)  to give notice to claimants in the manner provided in Sections
48-2c-1305 and 48-2c-1306.
(b)  If the company is reinstated in accordance with Section 48-2c-1208,
business conducted by the company during a period of administrative
dissolution is unaffected by the dissolution.
(4)  The administrative dissolution of a company does not terminate the
authority of its registered agent.
(5)  A notice mailed under this section shall be:
(a)  mailed first-class, postage prepaid; and
(b)  addressed to the most current mailing address appearing on the records of
the division for:
(i)  the principal office of the company, if the notice is required to be
mailed to the company;
(ii)  the registered agent of the company, if the notice is required to be
mailed to the registered agent; or
(iii)  any member if the company is member-managed, or to any manager of the
company if the company is manager-managed, if the notice is required to be
mailed to a member or manager of the company.
